North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 82. Forestry Services and Advice for Owners and Operators of Forestland.

§ 106-1001.
Authority to render scientific forestry services.

In this Article, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture.

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

The Department is hereby authorized to designate, upon request, forest trees of forest landowners and forest operators for sale or removal, by blazing or otherwise, and to measure or estimate the volume of same under the terms and conditions hereinafter provided. The Department is also authorized to cooperate with landowners of the State and with counties, municipalities and State agencies by making available forestry services consisting of specialized equipment and operators, or by renting such equipment, and to perform such labor and services as may be necessary to carry out approved forestry practices, including site preparation, forest planting, prescribed burning, and other appropriate forestry practices. For such services or rentals, a reasonable fee representing the Commissioner’s estimate of not less than the costs of such services or rentals shall be charged, provided however, when the Commissioner deems it in the public interest, said services may be provided without charge, for the purpose of encouraging the use of approved scientific forestry practice on the private or other forestlands within the State, or for the purpose of providing practical demonstrations of said practices. Receipts from these activities and rentals shall be credited to the budget of the Department for the furtherance of these activities.

History.

1947, c. 384, s. 1; 1969, c. 342, s. 3; c. 344; 1973, c. 1262, ss. 28, 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 95; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2011-145, s. 13.25(ee), (ff).

Transfer of Division of Forest Resources.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(a), provides: “(a) The Division of Forest Resources is transferred from the Department of Environment and Natural Resources to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services with all the elements of a Type I transfer, as defined by

G.S. 143A-6

.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(yy), provides: “The transfers under this section become effective July 1, 2011, and funds transferred shall be net of any changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(zz), provides: “Any references in this act to the Division of Forest Resources of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall be construed to refer to the Division of Forest Resources of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. Any references in this act to the Forestry Council of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall be construed to refer to the Forestry Council of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.”

§ 106-1002.
Services under direction of Commissioner; compensation; when services without charge.

The administration of the provisions of this Article shall be under the direction of the Commissioner. The Commissioner, or his authorized agent, upon receipt of a request from a forest landowner or operator for technical forestry assistance or service, may designate forest trees for removal for lumber, veneer, poles, piling, pulpwood, cordwood, ties, or other forest products by blazing, spotting with paint or otherwise designating in an approved manner; he may measure or estimate the commercial volume contained in the trees designated; he may furnish the landowner or operator with a statement of the volume of the trees so designated and estimated; he may assist in finding a suitable market for the products so designated, and he may offer general forestry advice concerning the management of the forest.

For such designating, measuring or estimating services the Commissioner may make a charge, on behalf of the Department, in an amount not to exceed five percent (5%) of the sale price or fair market value of the stumpage so designated and measured or estimated. Upon receipt from the Commissioner of a statement of such charges, the landowner or operator or his agent shall make payment to the Commissioner within 30 days.

In those cases where the Commissioner deems it desirable to so designate and measure or estimate trees without charge, such services shall be given for the purpose of encouraging the use of approved scientific forestry principles on the private or other forestlands within the State, and to establish practical demonstrations of said principles.

History.

1947, c. 384, s. 2; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 96; 2011-145, s. 13.25(ee), (ff).

§ 106-1003.
Deposit of receipts with State treasury.

All moneys paid to the Commissioner for services rendered under the provisions of this Article shall be deposited into the State treasury to the credit of the Department.

History.

1947, c. 384, s. 3; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 97; 2011-145, s. 13.25(ee); 2018-113, s. 5(d).

§ 106-1004.
Fees for forest management plans.

The Board of Agriculture shall establish a schedule of fees for the preparation of forest management plans developed pursuant to this Chapter. The fees established by the Board shall not exceed the amount necessary to offset the costs of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to prepare forest management plans.

History.

2014-100, s. 13.13(a); 2014-120, s. 58; 2016-113, s. 7(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-120, s. 58, effective September 18, 2014, deleted “Article 83 of” preceding “this Chapter” near the end of the first sentence.

Session Laws 2016-113, s. 7(b), effective July 26, 2016, deleted “by rule” following “shall establish” near the beginning of the section.

§§ 106-1005 through 106-1009.

Reserved for future codification purposes.